Massachusetts, session 194th, S624.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION I. – The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
The Artificial Grass – & – Turf Surfaces – Installation Moratorium Act
An Act to Consider the Safety of artificial grass and turf surfaces.
SECTION II. – EMERGENCY PREAMBLE
Considering the apparent appearance of a Public Emergency, in The Commonwealth of
Massachusetts, caused by the installation of artificial grass, and various artificial surfaces, on
outdoor surfaces, including athletic sports fields, and parks; which may have caused, and may be
continuing to cause, serious environmental contamination by PFAS chemical materials; and/or
of 2

the covering over of ground soil, and water contamination; it is declared that this legislation is
that of an Emergency Nature. Upon its adoption, it shall be implemented immediately by the
Governor, The Department of Public Health (DPH), and all other appropriate agencies, by
appropriate immediate Declaration.
SECTION III. – PURPOSE – AND REQUIREMENTS
This legislation, shall require a Moratorium, of at least 36 months, from the date of its
passage; preventing the installation of any artificial grass, and/or similar artificial turf materials,
including in particular, on outdoor athletic fields, and parks. During this period of time, the
Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs (EEA) shall conduct a needed evaluation,
drawing on expert opinion, including those from the PFAS Lab of Northeastern University.
If a Comprehensive Athletic Surface Performance Commission (CASPC) is established
by legislation; or lacking legislation, a similar body, shall be established by the Secretary of
EEA, such analysis, shall be publicly reported; prior to the lifting of such 36 month Moratorium;
and not before the 36 month period, has elapsed.
of 2